Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202589-186
Handbooks; adoption by reference.

(1) The Legislature hereby adopts by reference the following:

(a) The standards of the National Conference on Weights and Measures published in National Institute of Standards and Technology Handbook 44 entitled Specifications, Tolerances, and Other Technical Requirements for Weighing and Measuring Devices as it existed on January 1, 2025, except Section 3.31. Vehicle - Tank meters. UR.2.2. Ticket Printer, Customer Ticket, Section 2.20. Scales, N.3. Minimum Test Weights and Test Loads; and Table 4, are not adopted. In addition to the language found in Section 3.30. Liquid-Measuring Devices, S.1.6.4., S.1.6.5., UR.3.2., and UR.3.3. of such handbook, any computing device in which a product or grade is offered for sale at more than one unit price may also compute at the lowest possible unit price for such transaction. All prices shall still be displayed or posted on the face of the dispenser. Such handbook shall govern all commercial and law enforcement weighing and measuring devices in the state;

(b) The Uniform Regulation for the Method of Sale of Commodities of the National Conference on Weights and Measures published in National Institute of Standards and Technology Handbook 130 entitled Uniform Laws and Regulations in the Areas of Legal Metrology and Engine Fuel Quality as it existed on January 1, 2025. Such handbook shall be used to determine the proper units of measurement to be used in the keeping for sale or sale of commodities;

(c) The Uniform Packaging and Labeling Regulation of the National Conference on Weights and Measures published in National Institute of Standards and Technology Handbook 130 entitled Uniform Laws and Regulations in the Areas of Legal Metrology and Engine Fuel Quality as it existed on January 1, 2025. Such handbook shall govern the packaging and labeling by weight, measure, or count of commodities kept for sale or sold in this state; and

(d) The procedures designated in National Institute of Standards and Technology Handbook 133 entitled Checking the Net Contents of Packaged Goods as it existed on January 1, 2025.

(2) Copies of the handbooks adopted by reference in this section shall be filed with the Secretary of State, Clerk of the Legislature, and Department of Agriculture. Copies filed with the Clerk of the Legislature shall be filed electronically.

(3) Whenever there exists an inconsistency between the provisions of the Weights and Measures Act other than this section and any of the handbooks adopted by reference, the requirements of such provisions of the act shall control.

Laws 1972, LB 1413, § 4;

Laws 1980, LB 633, § 6;

Laws 1991, LB 356, § 9;

Laws 1992, LB 366, § 67;

Laws 1993, LB 267, § 28;

Laws 1999, LB 473, § 2;

Laws 2003, LB 161, § 3;

Laws 2013, LB222, § 46;

Laws 2020, LB835, § 5;

Laws 2025, LB245, § 12.